Vermont, session 2025-2026, H279.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. COSTS OF ELECTRIC GRID UPGRADES; PUBLIC UTILITY
COMMISSION RULE
(a) On or before July 1, 2026, the Public Utility Commission shall adopt by
rule standards and procedures for ensuring that the costs of any improvements
or upgrades to the electric transmission and distribution grid in a utility’s
service territory are shared as fairly and as evenly as possible among all
ratepayers in the utility’s service territory.
VT LEG #379359 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.279
2025 Page 2 of 2
(b) On or before July 1, 2031, the Public Utility Commission shall adopt by
rule standards and procedures for ensuring that the costs of any improvements
or upgrades to the electric transmission and distribution grid, regardless of the
utility’s service territory in which the upgrade or improvement is made, are
shared as fairly and as evenly as possible among all ratepayers in the State.
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
VT LEG #379359 v.1